Maryland, session 2025, HB0792.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–207.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0792*

HOUSE BILL 792
(a) To the extent included in federal adjusted gross income, the amounts under
this section are subtracted from the federal adjusted gross income of a resident to determine
Maryland adjusted gross income.
(mm) (1) (i) In this subsection the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(ii) “Correctional officer” means an individual who:
1. was employed in:
A. a State correctional facility, as defined in § 1–101 of the
Correctional Services Article;
B. a local correctional facility, as defined in § 1–101 of the
Correctional Services Article;
C. a juvenile facility included in § 9–226 of the Human
Services Article; or
D. a facility of the United States that is equivalent to a State
or local correctional facility or a juvenile facility included in § 9–226 of the Human Services
Article; and
2. is eligible to receive retirement income attributable to the
individual’s employment under item 1 of this subparagraph.
(iii) “Emergency services personnel” means emergency medical
technicians or paramedics.
(iv) “Employee retirement system” has the meaning stated under §
10–209(a) of this subtitle.
(v) “Public safety employee” means an individual who is a retired
correctional officer, law enforcement officer, or fire, rescue, or emergency services personnel
of the United States, the State, or a political subdivision of the State.
(2) The subtraction under subsection (a) of this section includes the first
[$15,000] $20,000 of income from an employee retirement system that is attributable to
service as a public safety employee, if the income is received by an individual who is at least
55 years old on the last day of the taxable year.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024.